Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 21.2 Lost Property

33-21.2-1.
Report of lost money or goods by finder.

Any person who finds money or goods of a value of fifty ($50.00) dollars or more, the owner of which is unknown, may, within two (2) days of the finding thereof report the finding to the officer in charge of the police station in the city or town where said property was found and deliver over the property to said officer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

33-21.2-2.
Restitution of lost money or goods.

If within ninety (90) days of turning the lost money or goods over to the police the owner appears and pays all reasonable costs incurred by the finder and/or the police, he or she shall have restitution of the money or goods.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

33-21.2-3.
Rights of finder if no owner appears.

If the owner of lost money or goods does not appear and claim his or her property as provided in §

33-21.2-2

, the property shall enure to the finder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

33-21.2-4.
Disposition of lost money or goods.

If the finder fails to claim said money or goods within six (6) months of reporting and delivering the lost property to the police, the property shall be presumed abandoned and shall revert to the general fund of the state in accordance with the state’s unclaimed intangible and tangible property program, pursuant to chapter 21.1 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 240, § 1.